North Carolina statutes. Chapter 50A. Uniform Child-Custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act and Uniform Deployed Parents Custody and Visitation Act.
Part 4. Return From Deployment.

§ 50A-385.
Procedure for terminating temporary grant of custodial responsibility established by agreement.

At any time following return from deployment, a temporary agreement granting custodial responsibility under Part 2 of this Article may be terminated by an agreement to terminate signed by the deploying parent and the other parent.

The temporary agreement granting custodial responsibility terminates if (i) the agreement to terminate specifies a date for termination or (ii) the agreement to terminate does not specify a date, on the date the agreement to terminate is signed by both parents.

In the absence of an agreement to terminate, the temporary agreement granting custodial responsibility terminates 60 days from the date the deploying parent gives notice to the other parent that the deploying parent has returned from deployment, unless earlier terminated upon the date stated in an order terminating the temporary grant of custodial responsibility or the death of the deploying parent.

If the temporary agreement granting custodial responsibility was filed with a court pursuant to

G.S. 50A-364

, an agreement to terminate the temporary agreement shall also be filed with that court within a reasonable period of time after the signing of the agreement. The case number and heading of the existing custodial responsibility or child support case shall be provided to the court with the agreement to terminate.

History.

2013-27, s. 3; 2014-115, s. 38(c).

§ 50A-386.
Consent procedure for terminating temporary grant of custodial responsibility established by court order.

At any time following return from deployment, the deploying parent and the other parent may file with the court an agreement to terminate a temporary order for custodial responsibility issued under Part 3 of this Article. After an agreement has been filed, the court shall issue an order terminating the temporary order on the date specified in the agreement. If no date is specified, the court shall issue the order immediately.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-387.
Visitation before termination of temporary grant of custodial responsibility.

After a deploying parent returns from deployment and until a temporary agreement or order for custodial responsibility established under Part 2 or Part 3 of this Article is terminated, the court shall enter a temporary order granting the deploying parent reasonable contact with the child unless it is contrary to the best interest of the child. The court shall enter a temporary order granting contact under this section even if the time exceeds the time the deploying parent spent with the child before deployment.

History.

2013-27, s. 3.

§ 50A-388.
Termination by operation of law of temporary grant of custodial responsibility established by court order.

A temporary order for custodial responsibility issued under Part 3 of this Article shall terminate, if no agreement between the parties to terminate a temporary order for custodial responsibility has been filed, 60 days from the date the deploying parent gives notice of having returned from deployment to the other parent and any nonparent granted custodial responsibility, when applicable, or upon the death of the deploying parent, whichever occurs first.

Any proceedings seeking to terminate or prevent termination of a temporary order for custodial responsibility are governed by laws of this State.

History.

2013-27, s. 3; 2014-115, s. 38(d).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2014-115, s. 38(d), effective August 11, 2014, in subsection (a), deleted “(i)” preceding “the date” and “(ii)” preceding “the death”, substituted “and” for “or” following “other parent” and inserted “when applicable,” “upon”, and “whichever occurs first”.

§§ 50A-389 through 50A-394.

Reserved for future codification purposes.